Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1010.
do enact as follows:AB1010,11Section 1. 655.007 of the statutes is amended to read:AB1010,2,52655.007 Patients’ claims. On and after July 24, 1975, any Any patient or 3the patient’s representative having a claim or any spouse, parent, minor sibling, or 4adult or minor child of the patient having a derivative claim for injury or death on 5account of malpractice is subject to this chapter.AB1010,26Section 2. 655.0165 of the statutes is created to read:AB1010,2,127655.0165 Claim by minor or adult child for injury or death. (1) If a 8parent is injured or dies as the result of medical malpractice, an adult child of the 9parent for which any of the following is true or a minor child of the parent has a 10cause of action for damages for loss of society and companionship and other 11damages incurred by the minor or adult child against the person who committed 12the medical malpractice:AB1010,2,1613(a) The adult child has a disability and was, prior to the parent’s injury or 14death, dependent on the injured or deceased parent for custodial, financial, or 15emotional support for managing the basic or instrumental activities of daily living, 16which the parent can no longer provide.AB1010,3,417(b) At the time of the parent’s injury or death, the adult child was enrolled in 1a post-secondary education program, was dependent on the injured or deceased 2parent for financial support, and lacks the independent means to support himself 3or herself without financial support from the parent that is no longer available as a 4result of the parent’s injury or death.AB1010,3,65(c) The adult child incurred out-of-pocket costs to pay for expenses resulting 6from the medical malpractice, including any of the following:AB1010,3,871. Medical or custodial care expenses for the injured or deceased parent 8beginning from the time of the medical malpractice.AB1010,3,1092. Funeral or legal expenses incurred as a result of the injury or death of the 10parent.AB1010,3,1111(2) This section does not affect any other claim available under this chapter.AB1010,312Section 3. Initial applicability.AB1010,3,1413(1) This act first applies to a cause of action arising on the effective date of this 14subsection.AB1010,3,1515